Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.650

Hop commodity board—Powers.

In order to ensure a viable and stable hop industry within the state of Washington and to further the policies set forth in RCW 15.65.040(2) (d) and (f), the legislature specifically recognizes that the hop commodity board has the power to enter into contracts, at its discretion, with individual producers of hops to set aside or remove from production existing planted hop acreage until such time as the need to contract with individual producers of hops is eliminated based on the adoption of a federal marketing order. This section does not limit the director's duty under RCW 15.65.600.

[ 2002 c 313 s 138.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.